test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-68naelguemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `nälgümä: # Verb (68) `nälgümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nälgümä+V+Inf/mA: nälgümä
     nälgümä+V+Inf: nälgüdäq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nälgü
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [nälgüt, nälgüdeq]
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nälgüs
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nälgümiq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nälgütiq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nälgüseq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [nälgü-üiq, nälgü-üi, nälgü-iq, nälgü-i]
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: nälgüq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: nälgü
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nälgütäs
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [nälgütä-äiq, nälgütä-äi, nälgütä-iq, nälgütä-i]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: nälgütäq
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: nälgütä

     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nälgü
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [nälgüt, nälgüq, nälgüdeq]
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nälgü
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nälgümiq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nälgütiq
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [nälgüq, nälgüväq]
     nälgümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [nälgü-üs, nälgü-s]

#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nälgüti
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:
#     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:
     nälgümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [nälgütä-äs, nälgütä-s]


     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nälgüv
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: nälgüvä
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: nälgüvät
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: nälgüvähe
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nälgüväq
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [nälgüvide, nälgüviide]
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [nälgüvit, nälgüviid]
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [nälgüvihe, nälgüviihe]

     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nälgütäv
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: nälgütävä
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: nälgütävät
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: nälgütävähe
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nälgütäväq
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [nälgütävide, nälgütäviide]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [nälgütävit, nälgütäviid]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [nälgütävihe, nälgütäviihe]

     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nälgünüq
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: nälgünü
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: nälgünüt
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: nälgünühe
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nälgünüq
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [nälgünüide, nälgünüisi]
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [nälgünüid, nälgünüisi]
     nälgümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [nälgünüihe, nälgünüisihe]

     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [nälgüt, nälgütü]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: nälgüdü
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: nälgütüt
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: nälgütühe
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nälgüdüq
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [nälgütüide, nälgütüisi]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [nälgütüid, nälgütüisi]
     nälgümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [nälgütüihe, nälgütüisihe]
